Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-757
Industrial sickness and accident insurance; required statement on policy.

No policy of industrial sickness and accident insurance may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it has printed thereon the words industrial policy.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 14(3), p. 467.